Illinois, session 104th, SB2281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Land Conservation Incentives Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that the State of Illinois' 8unique natural resources, wildlife habitats, open spaces, 9agricultural and forested resources, wetlands, and historic 10resources are of significant benefit to the State and the 11public.12    (b) The General Assembly finds that the State of Illinois' 13unique natural resources and distinctive natural heritage, 14including habitat for plants, animals and natural communities, 15are being lost at an alarming rate.16    (c) The General Assembly finds that much of the State of 17Illinois' unique natural, historical and open space resources 18and habitats are found on lands that are privately owned.19    (d) The General Assembly desires to encourage private 20landowners to be stewards of lands and waters that are 21important habitat or designated natural areas or which contain 22significant natural, open space, and historic resources.23    (e) The General Assembly desires to complement and advance   SB2281- 2 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1existing state priorities as embedded in identified in State 2law, including, but not limited to, the Illinois Agricultural 3Areas Conservation and Protection Act, the Illinois Natural 4Areas Preservation Act, the Real Property Conservation Rights 5Act, and the Illinois Farmland Preservation Act, thereby 6preserving public financial resources and leveraging public 7expenditures.8    (f) The General Assembly desires to provide private 9landowners with incentives to encourage protection of private 10lands for open space, natural resources, biodiversity 11conservation, water supply, outdoor recreation, farmland and 12forestland preservation, historic preservation, and land 13conservation purposes. 14    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 15adding Section 235 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)17    Sec. 235. Conservation land tax credit.18    (a) In this Section:19    "Conservation purposes" means for the purpose of open 20space conservation, natural resource conservation, 21biodiversity conservation, land conservation, agricultural 22conservation, watershed conservation, or historic 23preservation.24    "Public or private conservation agency" means:  SB2281- 3 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1        (1) a governmental body;2        (2) a private not-for-profit charitable corporation or 3    trust:4            (A) authorized to do business in the State of 5        Illinois;6            (B) authorized to acquire, hold, and maintain 7        title to real estate or interests in real estate;8            (C) organized and operated for conservation 9        purposes, including natural resource protection or 10        land conservation, or historic preservation purposes; 11        and12            (D) meeting other criteria or certification 13        determined by rule of the Department of Natural 14        Resources; or15        (3) a non-profit corporation having tax-exempt status 16    as a public charity under the U.S. Internal Revenue Code 17    of 1986, as amended, and having received accreditation 18    through the Land Trust Accreditation Commission.19    "Qualified donation" means the transfer and conveyance by 20gift, without consideration, of all or a portion of a 21qualified real property interest to a public or private 22conservation agency for a conservation purpose, provided that 23those purposes are secured in perpetuity through (i) 24restrictions recorded in the real property records of the 25county where the qualified real property interest is located, 26(ii) restrictions recorded in the real property records in the   SB2281- 4 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1county where the qualified real property interest is located, 2or (iii) by one or more other mechanisms to be developed by 3rule which will secure the real property for conservation 4purposes in perpetuity.5    "Qualified real property interest" means any one or more 6of the following interests in real property:7        (1) a fee simple interest;8        (2) a remainder interest; or9        (3) a restriction (granted in perpetuity and created 10    pursuant to Illinois real property law) on the use that 11    may be made of the real property and that complies with 12    Section 170(h)(2)(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.13    (b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 142025, there shall be allowed as a credit against the tax 15imposed by Section 201 for the taxable year with respect to 16qualified real property interest conveyed for conservation and 17preservation purposes as the qualified donation by the 18taxpayer an amount equal to the fair market value of the 19qualified donation made of qualified real property interest 20conveyed for conservation and preservation purposes.21        (1) Any qualified donations made by a taxpayer under 22    this Section for the credit against the tax imposed by 23    Section 201 shall be substantiated by a Qualified 24    Appraisal prepared by a Qualified Appraiser, as those 25    terms are defined under 26 CFR 1.170A-17.26        (2) The amount of the credit that may be claimed by a   SB2281- 5 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1    taxpayer under this Section shall not exceed $200,000. In 2    addition, in any one tax year the credit used may not 3    exceed the amount of individual or corporate income tax 4    otherwise due. Any portion of the credit which is unused 5    in any one tax year may be carried over for a maximum of 20 6    consecutive tax years following the tax year in which the 7    credit originated until fully expended.8        (3) A taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this 9    Section may transfer, for consideration, all or a portion 10    of any unexpended tax credit which may be available to 11    another taxpayer for use by such other taxpayer, as 12    transferee, to apply as a credit against tax imposed by 13    State law. Notice of such transfer and the amount of such 14    tax credits so transferred shall be filed with the 15    transferee's and transferor's tax returns, pursuant to 16    rules that may be adopted to implement this Section.17    (c) The tax credits provided by this Section shall apply 18to transfers of interests in land in taxable years beginning 19on or after January 1, 2025, and all taxable years thereafter.20    (d) Any taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this Section 21may not claim a credit under any similar law for costs related 22to the same project.23    (e) Any tax credits which arise under this Section from 24the donation of an interest in land made by a pass-through tax 25entity such as a trust, estate, partnership, limited liability 26corporation or partnership, limited partnership, S   SB2281- 6 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1corporation, or other fiduciary shall be used either by such 2entity if it is the taxpayer on behalf of such entity or by the 3member, manager, partner, shareholder, or beneficiary, as the 4case may be, in proportion to their interest in such entity if 5that income, deductions, and tax liability passes through such 6entity to such member, manager, partner, shareholder, or 7beneficiary. Such tax credits may not be claimed by both the 8entity and the member, manager, partner, shareholder, or 9beneficiary for the same donation.10    (f) In the case of a pass-through entity described in 11subsection (e), no qualified real property interest shall be 12eligible for a tax credit under this Section unless such 13entity acquired the land or qualified real property interest 14by purchase 3 or more years before the tax year in which a tax 15credit under this Section for the qualified real property 16interest is being sought.17    (g) Subsection (f) shall not apply with respect to any 18gift of a qualified real property interest by any partnership 19or pass through entity for which a tax credit is being sought 20under this Section if substantially all of the partnership 21interests or pass through entity interests in such partnership 22or pass through entity are held, directly or indirectly, by an 23individual or by members of the family of such individual. In 24this subsection, "members of the family" means, with respect 25to any individual, the spouse of such individual, and any 26individual who bears a relationship to such individual as   SB2281- 7 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1described in Section 152(d)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue 2Code, subparagraphs (A) through (G).3    (h) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 4the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. 5    (i) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 6250. 7    (j) The Department of Natural Resources may adopt rules as 8may be deemed necessary in fulfillment of the purposes of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The Department 10of Natural Resources, on or before the date that is 5 years 11after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 12General Assembly, shall prepare and submit a report to the 13General Assembly showing the lands protected during such 14period pursuant to this Act.15    (k) The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the 16Department of Natural Resources, shall adopt rules as may be 17deemed necessary to administer the tax incentives provided for 18in this Section and shall coordinate with the Department of 19Natural Resources in the preparation of the report to the 20General Assembly under subsection (j) of this Section showing 21the fiscal impact on the State treasury of the credits claimed 22pursuant to this Act.23    (l) No part or segment of this Section shall be 24interpreted to in any way alter or amend any permit 25requirements, reporting requirements, allocation procedures, 26or other requirements set forth in any other provision of   SB2281- 8 -LRB104 09415 HLH 19474 b1State law.